Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3705
Court appointed special advocate volunteer, defined.

Court appointed special advocate volunteer or volunteer means an individual appointed by a court pursuant to the Court Appointed Special Advocate Act.

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 28.